California, session 20252026, AB1489.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13667 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13667. (a) As used in this section, “carry” means to have direct physical control of or be physically connected to a firearm, including, but not limited to, when it is in a holster and that hostler holster is affixed to an individual’s person.(b) A law enforcement agency that issues a firearm to a peace officer it employs a peace officer shall have a policy prohibiting that peace officer from carrying the firearm issued by the agency with a firearm when the officer has a blood alcohol concentration greater than 0.00 percent, whether the officer is on duty or off duty.(c) This section does not apply to an officer who is on duty and engaged in an undercover assignment in the course of their employment as a peace officer.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.